Utah statutes.
9-1-203.   Compliance with Administrative Procedures Act.

The department and all of its divisions, boards, offices, bureaus, commissions, and other entities shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

